Utah statutes.
31A-30-208.   Enrollment for defined contribution arrangements.

(1)  An insurer offering a health benefit plan in the defined contribution arrangement market:

(a)  shall allow an employer to enroll in a small employer defined contribution arrangement plan;

(b)  may not impose a surcharge under Section 31A-30-106.7 for a small employer group selecting a defined contribution arrangement health benefit plan on or before January 1, 2012; and

(c)  shall otherwise comply with the requirements of this part, Chapter 42, Defined Contribution Risk Adjuster Act, and Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 25, Health System Reform Act.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection 31A-30-202.5(2), in accordance with Subsection (2)(b), on January 1 of each year, an insurer may enter or exit the defined contribution arrangement market.

(b)  An insurer may offer new or modify existing products in the defined contribution arrangement market:

(i)  on January 1 of each year;

(ii)  when required by changes in other law; and

(iii)  at other times as established by the risk adjuster board created in Section 31A-42-201.

(c) (i)  An insurer shall give the department, the Health Insurance Exchange, and the risk adjuster board 90 days' advance written notice of any event described in Subsection (2)(a) or (b).

(ii)  When an insurer elects to participate in the defined contribution arrangement market, the insurer shall participate in the defined contribution arrangement market for no less than two years.



Amended by Chapter 400, 2011 General Session

